Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1883.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1333.5. Chronic Absence Prevention and Support.--(a) Each school shall collect daily attendance data for each student enrolled and report attendance using a standardized system to the department in accordance with the following:(1) Attendance data shall include all absences, disaggregated by grade, student group and reason for absence, categorized by the following:(i) Satisfactory, meaning less than five percent (5%) absent.1234567891011121314151617181920 (ii) At-risk, meaning five percent (5%) to nine percent (9%) absent.(iii) Moderate, meaning ten percent (10%) to nineteen percent (19%) absent.(iv) Severe, meaning twenty percent (20%) or more absent.(2) The department shall maintain a publicly accessible, real-time attendance dashboard for educators, policymakers, families and the public to ensure transparency and actionable insights.(3) The department shall produce an annual report summarizing chronic absence trends, interventions implemented and outcomes achieved across districts and schools.(b) Each school shall establish an SAIP aligned with an MTSS to address chronic absence through prevention, early intervention and targeted support. Each SAIP shall include:(1) Identification of students at risk of chronic absence.(2) Tiered interventions, increasing in intensity based on student needs.(3) Coordination with counselors, social workers, teachers and community partners.(4) Monitoring of progress, outcomes and equity measures.(c) An SAIP shall be developed collaboratively with students, families of students and community stakeholders and shall be reviewed at least twice per year.(d) A school shall:(1) Ensure that attendance interventions are culturally and linguistically responsive, recognizing the diverse backgrounds of students and families.(2) Actively engage families in the development and implementation of an SAIP, providing guidance and resources to 20250HB1883PN2344 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 address barriers to attendance.(e) Additional support shall be provided to students from historically marginalized or vulnerable populations, including students of color, students with disabilities and students from low-income backgrounds, to address disparities in chronic absence.(f) A school shall provide intervention and support strategies in accordance with the following:(1) Schools shall prioritize supportive, restorative and preventive measures over punitive actions to improve attendance, including mentoring, counseling, academic supports, transportation assistance and connection to community services.(2) Legal action or court involvement shall be used only as a last resort, after all supportive interventions have been exhausted and documented.(g) A school shall provide recognition and resource allocation in accordance with the following:(1) Schools achieving meaningful reductions in chronic absence shall be publicly recognized.(2) The department shall use attendance data to target resources and technical assistance to schools most in need of support.(h) The department shall provide implementation and oversight in accordance with the following:(1) The department shall provide guidance, training and technical assistance to support districts and schools in adopting best practices and implementing an SAIP aligned with MTSS.(2) The department shall monitor implementation, evaluate effectiveness and recommend continuous improvements to the 20250HB1883PN2344 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 framework.(i) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Chronic absence." A student missing ten percent (10%) or more of enrolled school days in a school year for any reason, including excused and unexcused absences."MTSS." A multitiered system of supports which is a framework of evidence-based academic, behavioral and social-emotional supports provided at increasing levels of intensity based on student needs."SAIP." A school attendance improvement plan that a school creates in accordance with this section designed to reduce chronic absence and provide targeted supports.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1883PN2344 - 4 - 123456789101112131415